Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB778.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1804-C of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1804-C. Approval.* * *(d.1) Approval schedule.--The Department of Community and Economic Development shall develop a schedule for the approval of applications under this section as follows:(1) Following the effective date of this paragraph, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 applications for two initial city revitalization and improvement zones and one pilot zone may be approved.(2) Beginning in 2028, the department shall approve applications for two additional zones each calendar year.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0778PN0833 - 2 - 123456